Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.276

Limousine carrier.

"Limousine carrier" means a person engaged in the transportation of a person or group of persons, who, under a single contract, acquires, on a prearranged basis, the use of a limousine to travel to a specified destination or for a particular itinerary. The term "prearranged basis" refers to the manner in which the carrier dispatches vehicles.

[ 1996 c 87 s 3.]